Hawaii, session 2025, SB1608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    School safety; school resource officers; guards.  (a) The department shall assign school resource officers or guards registered pursuant to chapter 463 to serve at each department school during hours when students are expected to be on the school campus.  The officers or guards shall be trained for mass-shooting response and de-escalation. In determining the number of officers or guards that shall be assigned to each department school, the department shall consider: (1)  The size of the school campus; (2)  The number of students in the school; and (3)  Other factors relevant to student safety. (b)  The department shall seek federal grants to the extent necessary for the costs relating to the hiring of school resource officers and registered guards. (c)  The department shall work with local law enforcement during the hiring process to prioritize employing retirees from the police department and department of law enforcement and other qualified individuals." SECTION 2.  Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "302D-    School safety; school resource officers; guards.  (a) The department shall assign school resource officers or guards registered pursuant to chapter 463 to serve at each charter school during hours when students are expected to be on the school campus.  The officers or guards shall be trained for mass-shooting response and de-escalation. In determining the number of officers or guards that shall be assigned to each charter school, the department shall consider: (1)  The size of the school campus; (2)  The number of students in the school; and (3)  Other factors relevant to student safety. (b)  The department shall seek federal grants to the extent necessary for the costs relating to the hiring of school resource officers and registered guards. (c)  The department shall work with local law enforcement during the hiring process to prioritize employing retirees from the police department and department of law enforcement and other qualified individuals." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the provision of school resource officers and guards at department public school and charter school. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________